Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.020

Auditoriums, art museums, swimming pools, etc.—Power to acquire.

Any city or town in this state acting through its council or other legislative body, and any separately organized park district acting through its board of park commissioners or other governing officers, shall have power to acquire by donation, purchase or condemnation, and to construct and maintain public auditoriums, art museums, swimming pools, and athletic and recreational fields, including golf courses, buildings and facilities within or without its parks, and to use or let the same for such public and private purposes for such compensation and rental and upon such conditions as its council or other legislative body or board of park commissioners shall from time to time prescribe.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.020. Prior: 1947 c 28 s 1; 1937 c 98 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8981-4.]

NOTES:

Acquisition of property for parks, recreational, viewpoint, greenbelt, conservation, historic, scenic or view purposes: RCW 36.34.340.